District of Columbia statutes.
44-705

Payments to needy patients.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia, pursuant to regulations prescribed by the Council of the District of Columbia, is authorized to furnish cash payments to needy patients in hospitals operated by or under contract (relating to the care of needy patients) with the District of Columbia in such amounts and at such times as he may determine.

Oct. 26, 1973, 87 Stat. 504, Pub. L. 93-140, § 4
1981 Ed., § 32-124.
1973 Ed., § 32-331.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to the District of Columbia Council and to a Commissioner of the District of Columbia. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.